District of Columbia statutes.
34-1212

Repealed

Evaluation of applications.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 13, 29 DCR 2872
Oct. 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-36, § 2(r), 30 DCR 4289
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-210, §§ 2(j), 3(d), 43 DCR 4702
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334
1981 Ed., § 43-1812.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3 of Cable Television Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-409, July 15, 2002, 49 DCR 7280).
Procedures approved for consideration of applications: Pursuant to Resolution 5-550, the “District of Columbia Cable Television Design Commission Evaluation and Clarification Procedures Approval Resolution of 1984,” effective February 14, 1984, the Council approved the evaluation and clarification procedures for the District of Columbia Cable Television Design Commission to consider applications to construct and operate a cable television system in the District of Columbia, which were submitted by the Commission to the Council on January 12, 1984.